Mississippi, session 2026, HB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to and subject to federal law, any business or entity that provides recurring subscription or membership services to customers shall provide notice to customers at least twenty-four (24) hours before charging customers for such  recurring subscriptions or memberships. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.